Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 27 Motor Vehicle Offenses

31-27-1.
Driving so as to endanger, resulting in death.

When the death of any person ensues as a proximate result of an injury received by the operation of any vehicle in reckless disregard of the safety of others, including violations of §

31-27-22

, the person so operating the vehicle shall be guilty of “driving so as to endanger, resulting in death”.

Any person charged with the commission of this offense shall upon conviction be imprisoned for not more than ten (10) years and have his or her license to operate a motor vehicle suspended for no more than five (5) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 24, § 1; P.L. 1950 (s. s.), ch. 2639, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-27-1

; P.L. 1978, ch. 208, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 121, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 193, § 2.

31-27-1.1.
Driving so as to endanger, resulting in serious personal injury.

When the serious bodily injury of any person ensues as a proximate result of the operation of any vehicle in reckless disregard of the safety of others, including violations of §

31-27-22

, the person so operating the vehicle shall be guilty of “driving so as to endanger, resulting in serious bodily injury”.

“Serious bodily injury” means physical injury that creates a substantial risk of death or causes serious permanent disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ.

Any person charged with a violation of this section shall upon conviction be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years and have his or her license to operate a motor vehicle suspended for no more than three (3) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 184, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 121, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 193, § 2.

31-27-1.2.
Driving so as to endanger, resulting in physical injury.

When the physical injury of any person ensues as a proximate result of the operation of any vehicle in reckless disregard of the safety of others, including violations of §

31-27-22

, the person so operating the vehicle shall be guilty of “driving so as to endanger, resulting in physical injury”.

Any person charged with a violation of this section shall upon conviction be imprisoned for not more than two (2) years and have his or her license to operate a motor vehicle be suspended for no more than one year.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 193, § 1.

31-27-2.
Driving under influence of liquor or drugs.

Whoever drives or otherwise operates any vehicle in the state while under the influence of any intoxicating liquor, drugs, toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, or any combination of these, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, except as provided in subsection (d)(3), and shall be punished as provided in subsection (d) of this section.

Any person charged under subsection (a), whose blood alcohol concentration is eight one-hundredths of one percent (.08%) or more by weight, as shown by a chemical analysis of a blood, breath, or urine sample, shall be guilty of violating subsection (a). This provision shall not preclude a conviction based on other admissible evidence, including the testimony of a drug recognition expert or evaluator, certified pursuant to training approved by the Rhode Island department of transportation office on highway safety. Proof of guilt under this section may also be based on evidence that the person charged was under the influence of intoxicating liquor, drugs, toluene, or any controlled substance defined in chapter 28 of title 21, or any combination of these, to a degree that rendered the person incapable of safely operating a vehicle. The fact that any person charged with violating this section is, or has been, legally entitled to use alcohol or a drug shall not constitute a defense against any charge of violating this section.

[Deleted by P.L. 2021, ch. 170, § 1 and P.L. 2021, ch. 171, § 1.]

In any criminal prosecution for a violation of subsection (a), evidence as to the amount of intoxicating liquor, toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, or any combination of these, in the defendant’s blood at the time alleged as shown by a chemical analysis of the defendant’s breath, blood, saliva or urine or other bodily substance, shall be admissible and competent, provided that evidence is presented that the following conditions have been complied with:

The defendant has consented to the taking of the test upon which the analysis is made. Evidence that the defendant had refused to submit to the test shall not be admissible unless the defendant elects to testify.

A true copy of the report of the test result was hand delivered at the location of the test or mailed within seventy-two (72) hours of the taking of the test to the person submitting to a breath test.

Any person submitting to a chemical test of blood, urine, saliva or other body fluids shall have a true copy of the report of the test result mailed to him or her within thirty (30) days following the taking of the test.

The test was performed according to methods and with equipment approved by the director of the department of health of the state of Rhode Island and by an authorized individual.

Equipment used for the conduct of the tests by means of breath analysis had been tested for accuracy within thirty (30) days preceding the test by personnel qualified as hereinbefore provided, and breathalyzer operators shall be qualified and certified by the department of health within three hundred sixty-five (365) days of the test.

The person arrested and charged with operating a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor, toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of title 21 or any combination of these in violation of subsection (a), was afforded the opportunity to have an additional chemical test. The officer arresting or so charging the person shall have informed the person of this right and afforded him or her a reasonable opportunity to exercise this right, and a notation to this effect is made in the official records of the case in the police department. Refusal to permit an additional chemical test shall render incompetent and inadmissible in evidence the original report.

(i) Every person found to have violated subsection (b)(1) shall be sentenced as follows: for a first violation whose blood alcohol concentration is eight one-hundredths of one percent (.08%), but less than one-tenth of one percent (.1%), by weight, or who has a blood presence of any scheduled controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, shall be subject to a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100), nor more than three hundred dollars ($300); shall be required to perform ten (10) to sixty (60) hours of public community restitution, and/or shall be imprisoned for up to one year. The sentence may be served in any unit of the adult correctional institutions in the discretion of the sentencing judge and/or shall be required to attend a special course on driving while intoxicated or under the influence of a controlled substance; provided, however, that the court may permit a servicemember or veteran to complete any court-approved counseling program administered or approved by the Veterans’ Administration, and his or her driver’s license shall be suspended for thirty (30) days up to one hundred eighty (180) days. The sentencing judge or magistrate may prohibit that person from operating a motor vehicle, pursuant to subsection (d)(9) or (d)(10) of this section, that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system and/or blood and urine testing as provided in §

31-27-2.8

.

Every person convicted of a second violation within a five-year (5) period with a blood alcohol concentration of eight one-hundredths of one percent (.08%) or above, but less than fifteen hundredths of one percent (.15%), or whose blood alcohol concentration is unknown, or who has a blood presence of any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, and every person convicted of a second violation within a five-year (5) period, regardless of whether the prior violation and subsequent conviction was a violation and subsequent conviction under this statute or under the driving under the influence of liquor or drugs statute of any other state, shall be subject to a mandatory fine of four hundred dollars ($400). The person’s driving license shall be suspended for a period of one year to two (2) years, and the individual shall be sentenced to not less than ten (10) days, nor more than one year, in jail. The sentence may be served in any unit of the adult correctional institutions in the discretion of the sentencing judge; however, not less than forty-eight (48) hours of imprisonment shall be served consecutively. The sentencing judge shall require alcohol or drug treatment for the individual; provided, however, that the court may permit a servicemember or veteran to complete any court-approved counseling program administered or approved by the Veterans’ Administration and shall prohibit that person from operating a motor vehicle, pursuant to subsection (d)(9) or (d)(10) of this section, that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system and/or blood and urine testing as provided in §

31-27-2.8

.

Every person convicted of a second violation within a five-year (5) period whose blood alcohol concentration is fifteen hundredths of one percent (.15%) or above, by weight as shown by a chemical analysis of a blood, breath, or urine sample, or who is under the influence of a drug, toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in subsection (b)(1), shall be subject to mandatory imprisonment of not less than six (6) months, nor more than one year; a mandatory fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000); and a mandatory license suspension for a period of two (2) years from the date of completion of the sentence imposed under this subsection. The sentencing judge shall require alcohol or drug treatment for the individual; provided, however, that the court may permit a servicemember or veteran to complete any court approved counseling program administered or approved by the Veterans’ Administration. The sentencing judge or magistrate shall prohibit that person from operating a motor vehicle, pursuant to subsection (d)(9) or (d)(10) of this section, that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system and/or blood and urine testing as provided in § 31-27-2.8.

Every person convicted of a third or subsequent violation within a five-year (5) period with a blood alcohol concentration of eight one-hundredths of one percent (.08%) or above, but less than fifteen hundredths of one percent (.15%), or whose blood alcohol concentration is unknown or who has a blood presence of any scheduled controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, regardless of whether any prior violation and subsequent conviction was a violation and subsequent conviction under this statute or under the driving under the influence of liquor or drugs statute of any other state, shall be guilty of a felony and be subject to a mandatory fine of four hundred ($400) dollars. The person’s driving license shall be suspended for a period of two (2) years to three (3) years, and the individual shall be sentenced to not less than one year and not more than three (3) years in jail. The sentence may be served in any unit of the adult correctional institutions in the discretion of the sentencing judge; however, not less than forty-eight (48) hours of imprisonment shall be served consecutively. The sentencing judge shall require alcohol or drug treatment for the individual; provided, however, that the court may permit a servicemember or veteran to complete any court-approved counseling program administered or approved by the Veterans’ Administration, and shall prohibit that person from operating a motor vehicle, pursuant to subsection (d)(9) or (d)(10) of this section, that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system and/or blood and urine testing as provided in § 31-27-2.8.

Every person convicted of a third or subsequent violation within a ten-year (10) period whose blood alcohol concentration is fifteen hundredths of one percent (.15%) above by weight as shown by a chemical analysis of a blood, breath, or urine sample, or who is under the influence of a drug, toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in subsection (b)(1), shall be subject to mandatory imprisonment of not less than three (3) years, nor more than five (5) years; a mandatory fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000); and a mandatory license suspension for a period of three (3) years from the date of completion of the sentence imposed under this subsection. The sentencing judge shall require alcohol or drug treatment for the individual. The sentencing judge or magistrate shall prohibit that person from operating a motor vehicle, pursuant to subsection (d)(9) or (d)(10) of this section, that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system and/or blood and urine testing as provided in § 31-27-2.8.

In addition to the foregoing penalties, every person convicted of a third or subsequent violation within a five-year (5) period, regardless of whether any prior violation and subsequent conviction was a violation and subsequent conviction under this statute or under the driving under the influence of liquor or drugs statute of any other state, shall be subject, in the discretion of the sentencing judge, to having the vehicle owned and operated by the violator seized and sold by the state of Rhode Island, with all funds obtained by the sale to be transferred to the general fund.

Whoever drives or otherwise operates any vehicle in the state while under the influence of any intoxicating liquor, drugs, toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 28 of title 21, or any combination of these, when his or her license to operate is suspended, revoked, or cancelled for operating under the influence of a narcotic drug or intoxicating liquor, shall be guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than three (3) years and by a fine of not more than three thousand dollars ($3,000). The court shall require alcohol and/or drug treatment for the individual; provided, the penalties provided for in this subsection (d)(4) shall not apply to an individual who has surrendered his or her license and served the court-ordered period of suspension, but who, for any reason, has not had his or her license reinstated after the period of suspension, revocation, or suspension has expired; provided, further, the individual shall be subject to the provisions of subsection (d)(2)(i), (d)(2)(ii), (d)(3)(i), (d)(3)(ii), or (d)(3)(iii) regarding subsequent offenses, and any other applicable provision of this section.

For purposes of determining the period of license suspension, a prior violation shall constitute any charge brought and sustained under the provisions of this section or §

31-27-2.1

.

Any person over the age of eighteen (18) who is convicted under this section for operating a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol, other drugs, or a combination of these, while a child under the age of thirteen (13) years was present as a passenger in the motor vehicle when the offense was committed shall be subject to immediate license suspension pending prosecution. Any person convicted of violating this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor for a first offense and may be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not more than one year and a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000). Any person convicted of a second or subsequent offense shall be guilty of a felony offense and may be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not more than five (5) years and a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). The sentencing judge shall also order a license suspension of up to two (2) years, require attendance at a special course on driving while intoxicated or under the influence of a controlled substance, and alcohol or drug education and/or treatment. The individual may also be required to pay a highway assessment fee of no more than five hundred dollars ($500) and the assessment shall be deposited in the general fund.

Any person convicted of a violation under this section shall pay a highway assessment fine of five hundred dollars ($500) that shall be deposited into the general fund. The assessment provided for by this subsection shall be collected from a violator before any other fines authorized by this section.

Any person convicted of a violation under this section shall be assessed a fee of eighty-six dollars ($86).

If the person convicted of violating this section is under the age of eighteen (18) years, for the first violation he or she shall be required to perform ten (10) to sixty (60) hours of public community restitution and the juvenile’s driving license shall be suspended for a period of six (6) months, and may be suspended for a period up to eighteen (18) months. The sentencing judge shall also require attendance at a special course on driving while intoxicated or under the influence of a controlled substance and alcohol or drug education and/or treatment for the juvenile. The juvenile may also be required to pay a highway assessment fine of no more than five hundred dollars ($500) and the assessment imposed shall be deposited into the general fund.

If the person convicted of violating this section is under the age of eighteen (18) years, for a second or subsequent violation regardless of whether any prior violation and subsequent conviction was a violation and subsequent conviction under this statute or under the driving under the influence of liquor or drugs statute of any other state, he or she shall be subject to a mandatory suspension of his or her driving license until such time as he or she is twenty-one (21) years of age and may, in the discretion of the sentencing judge, also be sentenced to the Rhode Island training school for a period of not more than one year and/or a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

Any person convicted of a violation under this section may undergo a clinical assessment at the community college of Rhode Island’s center for workforce and community education. Should this clinical assessment determine problems of alcohol, drug abuse, or psychological problems associated with alcoholic or drug abuse, this person shall be referred to an appropriate facility, licensed or approved by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, for treatment placement, case management, and monitoring. In the case of a servicemember or veteran, the court may order that the person be evaluated through the Veterans’ Administration. Should the clinical assessment determine problems of alcohol, drug abuse, or psychological problems associated with alcohol or drug abuse, the person may have their treatment, case management, and monitoring administered or approved by the Veterans’ Administration.

Notwithstanding any other sentencing and disposition provisions contained in this chapter, if the judge or magistrate makes a finding beyond a reasonable doubt that a motorist was operating a vehicle in the state while under the influence of drugs, toluene, or any controlled substance as evidenced by the presence of controlled substances on or about the person or vehicle, or other reliable indicia or articulable conditions thereof, but not intoxicating liquor based on a preliminary breath test, results from a breathalyzer that indicates no blood alcohol concentration, or both, the judge or magistrate may exercise his or her discretion and eliminate the requirement of an ignition interlock system; provided, that blood and/or urine testing is mandated as a condition to operating a motor vehicle as provided in § 31-27-2.8.

Notwithstanding any other sentencing and disposition provisions contained in this chapter, if the judge or magistrate makes a finding beyond a reasonable doubt that a motorist was operating a vehicle in the state while under the influence of drugs, toluene, or any controlled substance as evidenced by the presence of controlled substances on or about the person or vehicle, or other reliable indicia or articulable conditions thereof and intoxicating liquor based on a preliminary breath test, results from a breathalyzer that indicates blood alcohol concentration, or both, the judge or magistrate may require an ignition interlock system in addition to blood and/or urine testing as a condition to operating a motor vehicle as provided in § 31-27-2.8.

(ii)

Every person convicted of a first violation whose blood alcohol concentration is one-tenth of one percent (.1%) by weight or above, but less than fifteen hundredths of one percent (.15%), or whose blood alcohol concentration is unknown, shall be subject to a fine of not less than one hundred ($100) dollars, nor more than four hundred dollars ($400), and shall be required to perform ten (10) to sixty (60) hours of public community restitution and/or shall be imprisoned for up to one year. The sentence may be served in any unit of the adult correctional institutions in the discretion of the sentencing judge. The person’s driving license shall be suspended for a period of three (3) months to twelve (12) months. The sentencing judge shall require attendance at a special course on driving while intoxicated or under the influence of a controlled substance and/or alcoholic or drug treatment for the individual; provided, however, that the court may permit a servicemember or veteran to complete any court-approved counseling program administered or approved by the Veterans’ Administration. The sentencing judge or magistrate may prohibit that person from operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system as provided in § 31-27-2.8.

(iii)

Every person convicted of a first offense whose blood alcohol concentration is fifteen hundredths of one percent (.15%) or above, or who is under the influence of a drug, toluene, or any controlled substance as defined in subsection (b)(1), shall be subject to a fine of five hundred dollars ($500) and shall be required to perform twenty (20) to sixty (60) hours of public community restitution and/or shall be imprisoned for up to one year. The sentence may be served in any unit of the adult correctional institutions in the discretion of the sentencing judge. The person’s driving license shall be suspended for a period of three (3) months to eighteen (18) months. The sentencing judge shall require attendance at a special course on driving while intoxicated or under the influence of a controlled substance and/or alcohol or drug treatment for the individual; provided, however, that the court may permit a servicemember or veteran to complete any court-approved counseling program administered or approved by the Veterans’ Administration. The sentencing judge or magistrate shall prohibit that person from operating a motor vehicle, pursuant to subsection (d)(9) or (d)(10) of this section, that is not equipped with an ignition interlock system and/or blood and urine testing as provided in § 31-27-2.8.

Percent by weight of alcohol in the blood shall be based upon milligrams of alcohol per one hundred cubic centimeters (100 cc) of blood.

There is established an alcohol and drug safety unit within the division of motor vehicles to administer an alcohol safety action program. The program shall provide for placement and follow-up for persons who are required to pay the highway safety assessment. The alcohol and drug safety action program will be administered in conjunction with alcohol and drug programs licensed by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

Persons convicted under the provisions of this chapter shall be required to attend a special course on driving while intoxicated or under the influence of a controlled substance, and/or participate in an alcohol or drug treatment program, which course and programs must meet the standards established by the Rhode Island department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals; provided, however, that the court may permit a servicemember or veteran to complete any court-approved counseling program administered or approved by the Veterans’ Administration. The course shall take into consideration any language barrier that may exist as to any person ordered to attend, and shall provide for instruction reasonably calculated to communicate the purposes of the course in accordance with the requirements of the subsection. Any costs reasonably incurred in connection with the provision of this accommodation shall be borne by the person being retrained. A copy of any violation under this section shall be forwarded by the court to the alcohol and drug safety unit. In the event that persons convicted under the provisions of this chapter fail to attend and complete the above course or treatment program, as ordered by the judge, then the person may be brought before the court, and after a hearing as to why the order of the court was not followed, may be sentenced to jail for a period not exceeding one year.

The alcohol and drug safety action program within the division of motor vehicles shall be funded by general revenue appropriations.

The director of the department of health is empowered to make and file with the secretary of state regulations that prescribe the techniques and methods of chemical analysis of the person’s body fluids or breath and the qualifications and certification of individuals authorized to administer this testing and analysis.

Jurisdiction for misdemeanor violations of this section shall be with the district court for persons eighteen (18) years of age or older and to the family court for persons under the age of eighteen (18) years. The courts shall have full authority to impose any sentence authorized and to order the suspension of any license for violations of this section. Trials in superior court are not required to be scheduled within thirty (30) days of the arraignment date.

No fines, suspensions, assessments, alcohol or drug treatment programs, course on driving while intoxicated or under the influence of a controlled substance, public community restitution, or jail provided for under this section can be suspended.

An order to attend a special course on driving while intoxicated, that shall be administered in cooperation with a college or university accredited by the state, shall include a provision to pay a reasonable tuition for the course in an amount not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00), and a fee of one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175), which fee shall be deposited into the general fund.

For the purposes of this section, any test of a sample of blood, breath, or urine for the presence of alcohol that relies in whole or in part upon the principle of infrared light absorption is considered a chemical test.

If any provision of this section, or the application of any provision, shall for any reason be judged invalid, such a judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder of the section, but shall be confined in this effect to the provision or application directly involved in the controversy giving rise to the judgment.

For the purposes of this section, “servicemember” means a person who is presently serving in the armed forces of the United States, including the Coast Guard, a reserve component thereof, or the National Guard. “Veteran” means a person who has served in the armed forces, including the Coast Guard of the United States, a reserve component thereof, or the National Guard, and has been discharged under other than dishonorable conditions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 24, § 2; P.L. 1950 (s.s.), ch. 2639, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-27-2

; P.L. 1959, ch. 101, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 213, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 120, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 321, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 227, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 138, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 150, § 39; P.L. 1986, ch. 275, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 433, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 494, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 508, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 329, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 496, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 65, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 37, § 6; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 94, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 405, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 418, § 5; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 26, § 3; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 35, § 7; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 14, § 7; P.L. 1996, ch. 224, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 91, art. 1, § 3; P.L. 1999, ch. 360, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 40; P.L. 2000, ch. 168, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 264, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 88, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 350, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 474, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 5, § 3; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 18, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 102, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 318, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 58, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 96, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 230, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 326, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 127, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 141, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 133, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 274, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 308, art. 2, § 9; P.L. 2021, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 171, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 12, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 12, effective May 25, 2022.